Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.220

Commission—Delegation of authority—Exception.

The commission may by resolution delegate all of its authority to the state treasurer except rule making.

[ 2009 c 9 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.